Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB696.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 214 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Department for Public Health shall make available to the public on its
website educational material on the recognition and warning signs of infantile
seizure disorder.
(2) The department may solicit and accept the assistance of relevant medical
associations or community resources to develop, promote, and distribute the
educational material.
(3) A health care provider who regularly provides care for infants shall offer to and
discuss with the families and caregivers of infants the information available
under subsection (1) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 311.601 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt reasonable rules and regulations to effectuate and implement
the provisions of KRS 311.550 to 311.620, including but not limited to regulations
designed to ensure the continuing professional competency of present and future
licensees. As an adjunct to the power conferred upon the board by this section, the
board may require licensees to submit to interrogation as to the nature and extent of
their postgraduate medical education and to require licensees found to be deficient
in their efforts to keep abreast of new methods and technology, to obtain additional
instruction and training therein.
(2) As part of the continuing medical education which the board adopts to ensure
continuing professional competency of present and future licensees, the board shall
ensure that:
(a) Current practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians practicing
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2210
in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting, demonstrate completion of a
one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing medical education
approved by the board and covering the recognition and prevention of
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020, prior to December
31, 2017;[ and]
(b) Future practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians who will
practice in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting, demonstrate
completion of a one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing
medical education, or its equivalent, approved by the board and covering the
recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in
KRS 620.020, within five (5) years of licensure. Future practicing
pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and pediatrics,
radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians who will practice in an
emergency medicine or urgent care setting may apply pediatric abusive head
trauma curriculum taught in their medical school education to count towards
the required one (1) hour of continuing medical education; and
(c) Current and future practicing pediatricians including those certified in
medicine and pediatrics, and family practitioners, demonstrate completion
of a one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing medical
education approved by the board and covering the recognition and warning
signs of infantile seizure disorder.
Section 3. KRS 311.844 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To be licensed by the board as a physician assistant, an applicant shall:
(a) Submit a completed application form with the required fee;
(b) Be of good character and reputation;
(c) Be a graduate of an approved program; and
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2210
(d) Have passed an examination approved by the board within three (3) attempts.
(2) A physician assistant who is authorized to practice in another state and who is in
good standing may apply for licensure by endorsement from the state of his or her
credentialing if that state has standards substantially equivalent to those of this
Commonwealth.
(3) A physician assistant's license shall be valid for two (2) years and shall be renewed
by the board upon fulfillment of the following requirements:
(a) The holder shall be of good character and reputation;
(b) The holder shall provide evidence of completion, during the previous two (2)
years, of a minimum of one hundred (100) hours of continuing education
approved by the American Medical Association, the American Osteopathic
Association, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American
Academy of Physician Assistants, or by another entity approved by the board.
The one hundred (100) hours of continuing education required by this
paragraph shall include:
1. During the first two (2) years of licensure or prior to the first licensure
renewal:
a. One and one-half (1.5) hours of continuing education in the
prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma, as
defined in KRS 620.020, except that graduating physician assistant
students may apply pediatric abusive head trauma curriculum
taught in their physician assistant graduate education to count
towards the required one and one-half (1.5) hours;[ and]
b. As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board
adopts to ensure continuing competency of present and future
licensees and the evolving needs of the growing senior population,
the board shall ensure physician assistants licensed under KRS
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2210
Chapter 311 complete a one (1) time course of one (1) hour of
continuing education approved by the board. The course shall be
completed one (1) time and count towards the current number of
required continuing education hours, except that graduating
student physician assistants may submit Alzheimer's and other
forms of dementia course curriculum taught in their programs of
study towards the required one (1) hour for approval. The course
topics shall include but not be limited to:
i. The warning signs and symptoms of Alzheimer's disease and
other forms of dementia;
ii. The importance of early detection, diagnosis, and appropriate
communication techniques for discussion of memory
concerns with the patient and his or her caregiver;
iii. Cognitive assessment and care planning billing codes;
iv. The variety of tools used to assess a patient's cognition; and
v. Current treatments that may be available to the patient; and
c. As a part of the continuing education requirements that the
board adopts to ensure continuing competency of licensees, all
physician assistants who regularly provide care for infants shall
demonstrate completion of a one (1) time course of at least one
(1) hour of continuing education approved by the board that
covers the recognition and warning signs of infantile seizure
disorder; and
2. If the license holder is authorized, pursuant to KRS 311.858(5), to
prescribe and administer Schedule III, IV, or V controlled substances, a
minimum of seven and one-half (7.5) hours of approved continuing
education relating to controlled substance diversion, pain management,
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2210
addiction disorders, use of the electronic system for monitoring
controlled substances established in KRS 218A.202, or any combination
of two (2) or more of these subjects; and
(c) The holder shall provide proof of current certification with the National
Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants.
Section 4. KRS 314.073 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As a prerequisite for license renewal, all individuals licensed under provisions of
this chapter shall be required to document continuing competency during the
immediate past licensure period as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the
board.
(2) The continuing competency requirement shall be documented and reported as set
forth by the board in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) The board shall approve providers of continuing education. The approval may
include recognition of providers approved by national organizations and state
boards of nursing with comparable standards. Standards for these approvals shall be
set by the board in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with the
provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) The board shall work cooperatively with professional nursing organizations,
approved nursing schools, and other potential sources of continuing education
programs to ensure that adequate continuing education offerings are available
statewide. The board may enter into contractual agreements to implement the
provisions of this section.
(5) The board shall be responsible for notifying applicants for licensure and licensees
applying for license renewal, of continuing competency requirements.
(6) As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board adopts to ensure
continuing competency of present and future licensees, the board shall ensure
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2210
practitioners licensed under KRS Chapter 314 complete a one-time training course
of at least one and one-half (1.5) hours covering the recognition and prevention of
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020. The one and one-half
(1.5) hours required under this section shall be included in the current number of
required continuing education hours.
(7) As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board adopts to ensure
continuing competency of present and future licensees and the evolving needs of
the growing senior population, the board shall ensure practitioners licensed under
KRS Chapter 314 complete a one (1) time course of one (1) hour of continuing
education approved by the board. The course shall be completed one (1) time and
count towards the current number of required continuing education hours, except
that graduating student practitioners may submit Alzheimer's and other forms of
dementia course curriculum taught in their programs of study towards the required
one (1) hour for approval. The course topics shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The warning signs and symptoms of Alzheimer's disease and other forms of
dementia;
(b) The importance of early detection, diagnosis, and appropriate communication
techniques for discussion of memory concerns with the patient and his or her
caregiver;
(c) Cognitive assessment and care planning billing codes;
(d) The variety of tools used to assess a patient's cognition; and
(e) Current treatments that may be available to the patient.
(8) As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board adopts to
ensure continuing competency of licensees, all advanced practice registered
nurses who regularly provide care for infants shall demonstrate completion of a
one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing education approved by
the board that covers the recognition and warning signs of infantile seizure
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2210
disorder.
(9) In order to offset administrative costs incurred in the implementation of the
mandatory continuing competency requirements, the board may charge reasonable
fees as established by regulation in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A.
(10)[(9)] The continuing competency requirements shall include at least five (5) contact
hours in pharmacology continuing education for any person licensed as an
advanced practice registered nurse.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/20/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed